test/src/morphology/N-common-noun-types_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:


# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.

  Noun - бачка: 
     бачка+N+Sg+Nom:    бачка
     бачка+N+Pl+Nom:    бачкаос
     бачка+N+Sg+Ine:    бакчаын
     бачка+N+Sg+Gen:    бакчалэн
     бачка+N+Sg+Advli:  бачкая

  Noun - дунне: 
     дунне+N+Sg+Nom:    дунне
     дунне+N+Pl+Nom:    дуннеос    
     дунне+N+Sg+Ine:    дуннеын    
     дунне+N+Sg+Gen:    дуннелэн    
     дунне+N+Sg+Advli:  дуннея

  Noun - ты:
     ты+N+Sg+Nom:       ты
     ты+N+Pl+Nom:       тыос       
     ты+N+Sg+Ine:       тыын       
     ты+N+Sg+Gen:       тылэн       
     ты+N+Sg+Advli:     тыя

  Noun - гурт:
     гурт+N+Sg+Nom:     гурт    
     гурт+N+Pl+Nom:     гуртъёс    
     гурт+N+Sg+Ine:     гуртын     
     гурт+N+Sg+Gen:     гуртлэн     
     гурт+N+Sg+Advli:   гуртъя

  Noun - тэль:
     тэль+N+Sg+Nom:     тэль    
     тэль+N+Pl+Nom:     тельёс     
     тэль+N+Sg+Ine:     тэлъын     
     тэль+N+Sg+Gen:     тэлълэн     
     тэль+N+Sg+Advli:   тэлья

  Noun - вить:
     вить+N+Sg+Nom:     вить    
     вить+N+Pl+Nom:     витьёс     
     вить+N+Sg+Ine:     витьын     
     вить+N+Sg+Gen:     витьлэн     
     вить+N+Sg+Advli:   витья
              
  Noun - уй:
     уй+N+Sg+Nom:       уй      
     уй+N+Pl+Nom:       уйёс      
     уй+N+Sg+Ine:       уйын      
     уй+N+Sg+Gen:       уйлэн       
     уй+N+Sg+Advli:     уйя
